Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5882.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "data center planning and responsibility act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Blockchain" means data that is both of the following: (i) Shared across a network to create a ledger of verified transactions or information among network participants linked using cryptography to maintain the integrity of the ledger and to execute other functions. (ii) Distributed among network participants in an automated fashion to concurrently update network participants on the state of the ledger and any other functions. (b) "Blockchain protocol" means any executable software deployed to a blockchain composed of a source code that is publicly available and accessible, including a smart contract or any network of smart contracts. (c) "Commission" means the Michigan public service commission created in section 1 of 1939 PA 3, MCL 460.1. (d) "Cryptocurrency mining" means using electricity to power a computer or node for the purpose of securing a blockchain. (e) "Cryptocurrency mining facility" means a group of computers in this state that work together that consume more than 1 megawatt of energy for the purpose of securing a blockchain protocol. (f) "Data center" means a facility in this state that is primarily used for data storage, data processing, or digital operations. (g) "Department" means the department of technology, management, and budget. (h) "Governing body" means the body in which the legislative powers of a local unit of government are vested. (i) "Large-scale data center" means a data center that exceeds the electrical load or infrastructure investment thresholds established by the commission under section 17. (j) "Local impact" means an impact on the public health, safety, and general welfare of the inhabitants and the lands and resources of a local unit of government, including, but not limited to, an impact on any of the following: (i) Energy capacity, consumption, and grid reliability. (ii) Water withdrawals and supply availability. (iii) Water discharge volumes and implications. (iv) Water treatment capacity. (v) Utility rate impacts. (vi) Noise. (vii) Lighting. (viii) Emissions. (ix) Property values. (x) Traffic impacts. (xi) Workforce impacts. (xii) Infrastructure impacts. (xiii) Fire and emergency response systems. (xiv) Public school district fiscal impacts. (k) "Local unit of government" means a county, township, city, or village or an agency or instrumentality of a county, township, city, or village. (l) "Moratorium" means a voluntary pause on the acceptance, review, or approval of applications for a rezoning, site plan approval, special land use approval, conditional land use approval, planned unit development approval, variance, or other zoning authorization. (m) "Node" means a computational device that contains and updates a copy of a blockchain. (n) "Nondisclosure agreement" means an agreement or contract that includes a provision or clause that provides that the construction of a proposed project is confidential or that a party to the agreement or contract is prohibited from disclosing, discussing, describing, or commenting on the construction of a proposed project. (o) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. (p) "Proposed project" means a large-scale data center or cryptocurrency mining facility that has a pending application for a zoning authorization before a local unit of government or may require a zoning authorization from a local unit of government in the future. Sec. 5. Before imposing a moratorium on large-scale data centers or cryptocurrency mining facilities under section 7, a local unit of government may do any of the following: (a) Establish a task force to evaluate the local impacts of a proposed project or recommend whether to impose a moratorium. The task force may consist of internal staff members, external consultants, qualified experts, utility liaisons, or other stakeholders. (b) Conduct 1 or more public hearings to solicit public input regarding a proposed project or whether to impose a moratorium. (c) Require the owner or operator of a proposed project to provide 1 or more studies or reports prepared by qualified experts to evaluate the local impacts of the proposed project. (d) Consult with 1 or more qualified experts to review a study or report provided under subdivision (c) or otherwise evaluate the local impacts of a proposed project. Sec. 7. (1) A local unit of government shall not impose a moratorium on large-scale data centers or cryptocurrency mining facilities unless all of the following conditions are met: (a) The moratorium is adopted by ordinance or resolution of the governing body at a public meeting. (b) The ordinance or resolution that adopts the moratorium includes all of the following: (i) The scope of the moratorium and any exemptions to the applicability of the moratorium. (ii) A process for a person to appeal the applicability of the moratorium to the person based on extraordinary hardship, including, at a minimum, that the appeal be written, public, and decided on the record. (iii) A provision that prohibits any elected official of the local unit of government from entering into a nondisclosure agreement related to the construction of a proposed project. (iv) A description of how the moratorium will serve the public health, safety, and general welfare of the inhabitants and the lands and resources of the local unit of government. (c) The moratorium is for an initial period not to exceed 6 months. (d) The local unit of government has not previously imposed a moratorium on similar proposed projects. (2) During a moratorium imposed under this section, a local unit of government shall not accept, review, or approve an application for a rezoning, site plan approval, special land use approval, conditional land use approval, planned unit development approval, variance, or other zoning authorization for any proposed project. (3) A local unit of government shall not extend a moratorium imposed under this section unless all of the following conditions are met: (a) The extension is adopted by ordinance or resolution of the governing body at a public meeting. (b) The local unit of government provides documentation of compelling circumstances that justify the extension. Compelling circumstances include, but are not limited to, additional time being necessary for the local unit of government to do any of the following: (i) Review public comments, studies, reports, and other materials received under this act. (ii) Receive a pending decision from this state or a utility provider. (iii) Resolve an outstanding appeal of the applicability of the moratorium. (iv) Propose or finalize a zoning ordinance amendment under section 9. (v) Conduct a final public hearing under section 9. (c) The extension is for a specified period not to exceed 90 days. (d) The local unit of government has not previously extended the moratorium. (4) Before the end of a moratorium imposed under this section, the governing body of a local unit of government shall conduct a vote at a public meeting to do either of the following: (a) Lift the moratorium, either immediately or on a specified date before the end of the moratorium. (b) Extend the moratorium in accordance with subsection (3). (5) After lifting a moratorium under subsection (4), a local unit of government shall resume the activities described in subsection (2). Sec. 9. (1) During a moratorium imposed under section 7, a local unit of government may do any of the following: (a) Provide continuing authority to a task force established under section 5 to coordinate and oversee the activities of the local unit of government during the moratorium. (b) Establish 1 or more monitoring committees to coordinate and oversee the activities of the local unit of government during the moratorium. The members of a monitoring committee may consist of internal staff members, external consultants, qualified experts, utility liaisons, or other stakeholders. (c) Obtain or require the owner or operator of a proposed project to provide 1 or more studies or reports prepared by qualified experts to evaluate the local impacts of the proposed project, including, but not limited to, any of the following: (i) A fire nexus report that evaluates the capability of local fire departments to respond to an incident at the proposed project. (ii) A power grid and infrastructure study that evaluates the impact of the proposed project on the local electrical grid. (iii) A water treatment facility study that evaluates the impact of the proposed project on the local water treatment plant and distribution system. (d) Obtain or require the owner or operator of a proposed project to provide 1 or more studies or analyses to evaluate the economic and fiscal impacts of a proposed project, including, but not limited to, impacts on local tax revenue, job creation, and long-term fiscal projections. (e) Solicit public input regarding a proposed project. (f) Conduct 1 or more public meetings or public hearings regarding a proposed project. (g) Consult with any person that the local unit of government determines is necessary to evaluate the impact of the proposed project, including, but not limited to, any of the following: (i) The owner or operator of a proposed project. (ii) An external consultant or qualified expert. (iii) The commission, the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy, or any other governmental entity. (h) Collect data from any source that is relevant to the local impacts of a proposed project. (i) Obtain 1 or more written legal opinions regarding a proposed project or any proposed zoning ordinance amendments. (j) Enter into 1 or more community benefit agreements with the owner or operator of a proposed project, a utility provider, or any other relevant person to mitigate or offset the local impacts of a proposed project. (k) Prepare a midpoint progress report that includes, but is not limited to, a description of the local unit of government's actions to date during the moratorium, a summary of the findings of any study, report, or analysis conducted under this act, and the basis for any proposed zoning ordinance amendments. (l) Propose 1 or more amendments to the zoning ordinances of the local unit of government, including, but not limited to, amendments that do any of the following: (i) Subject proposed projects to special land use approval or conditional land use approval. (ii) Limit proposed projects to a designated zoning district. (iii) Impose conditions, standards, or requirements on zoning authorizations for proposed projects. (m) Prepare a final comprehensive evaluation that identifies the most significant risks and opportunities of proposed projects and describes whether the local unit of government can accommodate proposed projects after adoption of any proposed zoning ordinance amendments or at all. (2) A local unit of government that imposes a moratorium under section 7 shall conduct a final public hearing before the end of the moratorium to present the findings of the local unit of government during the moratorium, explain any zoning ordinance amendments proposed under subsection (1), summarize any final comprehensive evaluation, and allow the public to offer testimony, ask questions, and submit final written comments. (3) After reasonable consideration of the public comments, studies, reports, and other materials received under this act, the governing body of a local unit of government may vote at a public meeting to formally adopt any zoning ordinance amendments proposed under subsection (1). Sec. 11. After the end of a moratorium imposed under section 7, a local unit of government may do any of the following: (a) Require large-scale data centers or cryptocurrency mining facilities to provide ongoing compliance reports on an annual basis. (b) Conduct periodic inspections of large-scale data centers or cryptocurrency mining facilities. (c) Reevaluate and amend the zoning ordinances of the local unit of government based on updated information regarding the local impacts of large-scale data centers or cryptocurrency mining facilities. Sec. 13. A local unit of government may require the owner or operator of a proposed project to pay for or reimburse any costs incurred by the local unit of government in connection with any study, report, analysis, consultation, or inspection under this act. The owner or operator shall promptly provide the payment or reimbursement upon receipt of a request by a local unit of government. A local unit of government may suspend its review of any pending zoning application for the owner or operator until the owner or operator complies with a request made under this section. Sec. 15. (1) If a local unit of government conducts a public meeting under this act, the public meeting must be conducted in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (2) If a local unit of government conducts a public hearing under this act, notice of the hearing must be provided in accordance with section 103 of the Michigan zoning enabling act, 2006 PA 110, MCL 125.3103. (3) A writing prepared, owned, used, in the possession of, or retained as required by this act must be made available to the public in compliance with the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. Sec. 17. The commission shall establish 1 or more electrical load or infrastructure investment thresholds for the classification of data centers as large-scale data centers for purposes of this act. The commission shall ensure that only data centers that require unusually large, concentrated, or nonroutine electrical loads or infrastructure investment exceed the thresholds. In establishing the thresholds, the commission shall consider all of the following: (a) System-level utility impacts of data centers that are not typical of commercial or light industrial users. (b) Any need for new or materially upgraded utility infrastructure. (c) Any need for utility capital investments that would be subject to the oversight or approval of the commission. (d) The electrical load requirements of data centers compared to hyperscale data centers and cryptocurrency mining facilities. (e) Any potential that utility costs of data centers will be shifted to other ratepayers. (f) Any existing utility tariff categories for large or special contract customers. (g) Any other factor that the commission considers relevant. Sec. 19. The department shall create and maintain a website that is accessible to the public that provides relevant information and resources related to best planning considerations for large-scale data centers and cryptocurrency mining facilities. Sec. 21. Nothing in this act shall be construed to do any of the following: (a) Override section 29 or 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. (b) Delay a large-scale data center or cryptocurrency mining facility that has received all necessary zoning authorizations from a local unit of government from beginning operation. (c) Alter an existing permitting requirement of this state. (d) Restrict a person's collective bargaining rights or alter wage laws or labor protections. (e) Create a private right of action. Enacting section 1. This act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5881 (request no. H06425'26 a) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.